Wisconsin, session 2025, AB306.
do enact as follows:AB306,11Section 1. 323.14 (4) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 323.14 (4) (b) 2. and 2amended to read:AB306,2,123323.14 (4) (b) 2. If, because of the emergency conditions, the governing body of 4the local unit of government is unable to meet promptly, the chief executive officer 5or acting chief executive officer of any local unit of government shall exercise by 6proclamation all of the powers conferred upon the governing body under par. (a) or 7s. 323.11 that appear necessary and expedient. The proclamation shall not exceed 860 days, unless the proclamation is extended by the governing body. The 9proclamation shall be subject to ratification, alteration, modification, extension, or 10repeal by the governing body as soon as that body can meet, but the subsequent 11action taken by the governing body shall not affect the prior validity of the 12proclamation.AB306,213Section 2. 323.14 (4) (b) 1. of the statutes is created to read:AB306,2,1514323.14 (4) (b) 1. In this paragraph, “chief executive officer” means any of the 15following:AB306,2,1716a. The county executive of a county, the county administrator of a county, or, 17in a county with an administrative coordinator, the county board chair of a county.AB306,2,1818b. The mayor or city manager of a city.AB306,2,1919c. The village president of a village.AB306,2,2020d. The town board chairperson of a town.AB306,2,2221e. A person acting as, or temporarily filling the role of, a person listed in subd. 221. a. to d.AB306,2,2323